Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Wyoming Animal Damage Management Program

§ 11-6-301.
Short title.

This article may be cited
as the “Wyoming animal damage management program”.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 3, provides: “The legislature finds and declares that it is important to the economy of the state to maximize agricultural production and at the same time, to promote, to protect and conserve the wildlife resources of the state.”

Laws 2003, ch. 112, § 3, directs the animal damage management board to develop and establish measurable goals and objectives with regard to refining the concept of integrated predator management. The board is to report to the governor and the joint agriculture, public lands and water resources interim committee, joint appropriations interim committee and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee on or before December 31 of each year to determine the progress the board has made toward achieving the goals and objectives it has established.

§ 11-6-302.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Board” means the Wyoming animal damage management board (ADMB);

“Crop” or “agricultural crop” when not otherwise defined by statute means corn, oats, wheat, barley, flax, sorghums and other grains, potatoes, vegetables, forage legumes, hay, and any other product of cultivation, trees, bees, honey and hives;

“Damage” means any injury to or loss of livestock, agricultural crops or wildlife inflicted by predatory animals, predacious birds or depredating animals;

“Depredating animal” means any trophy game animal or furbearing animal that causes damage;

“Furbearing animal” means badger, beaver, bobcat, marten, mink, muskrat or weasel;

“Livestock” means horses, mules, cattle, swine, sheep, goats, poultry, guard animals or any other animal maintained under domestication. Bison are considered livestock unless otherwise designated by the Wyoming livestock board and the Wyoming game and fish commission;

“Person” means as defined by W.S. 8-1-102(a)(vi);

“Predacious bird” means any predatory avian species that is permitted to be taken under either Wyoming law or federal law;

“Predatory animal” means:

Coyote, jackrabbit, porcupine, raccoon, red fox, skunk or stray cat; and

Until the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

, “predatory animal” includes wolves. After that date, “predatory animal” shall include any gray wolf within areas of the state where the state of Wyoming has jurisdiction for wildlife management, but not within an area of the state in which the gray wolf is:

Designated as a trophy game animal under W.S 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II).

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 2.

“Trophy game animal” means:

Black bear, grizzly bear or mountain lion; and

From and after the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

:

“Trophy game animal” shall include any gray wolf within those areas where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals as provided in W.S 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II).

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 2.

“Wildlife” means all wild mammals, birds, fish, amphibians, reptiles, crustaceans and mollusks, and wild bison designated by the Wyoming game and fish commission and the Wyoming livestock board within this state;

“Take” means as defined by W.S. 23-1-102(a)(vii).

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 2.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2003, ch. 115, § 2; 2006, ch. 87, § 1; 2007, ch. 168, § 3; 2012, ch. 25, §§ 1, 2.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “any predatory avian species that is permitted to be taken under either Wyoming law or federal law” for “English sparrow and starling” in (a)(viii), added (a)(xii), and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

updated internal references in (ix)(B)(II) and (x)(B)(I) of (a), rewrote (a)(x)(B)(I), and added (b).

The 2012 amendment,

in (a), added “within areas of the state where the state of Wyoming has jurisdiction for wildlife management, but” in the introductory language of (a)(ix), substituted “W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II)” for “subdivision (x)(B)(I) of this subsection” in (a)(ix)(B)(I), repealed former (a)(ix)(B)(II) which read: “Classified as a trophy game animal by the game and fish commission pursuant to W.S. 23-1-304(a),” rewrote (a)(x)(B)(I) to substitute a reference to a statutory section for formerly detailed description, repealed former (a)(x)(B)(II) which defined “trophy game animal” pursuant to W.S. 23-1-304(a), made stylistic changes; and repealed former (b) which authorized the governor to direct the game and fish commission to adopt boundaries between the area in which the wolf is treated as a trophy game animal and where it is treated as a predator in order to achieve federal government delisting of the gray wolf.

Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Subdivisions (a)(ix)(B)(II) and (x)(B)(I) and (II) of this section
were amended and subsection (b) was added by 2007 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 168, which provided the act was effective on and after
July 1, 2007 only upon certification by the Governor to the Secretary
of State of the occurrence of specified acts. On February 27, 2008,
in accordance with
W.S. 23-1-109(f), the Governor filed with the Secretary of State his certification
that all acts necessary for 2007 House Enrolled Act 123 (2007 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 168) to become effective have occurred. On November
19, 2007 the Governor certified that in accordance with subsection
(b) of this section the trophy game management boundary line for the
gray wolf has been changed and that the new boundary line is set forth
on pages 4 and 5 of the Wyoming Gray Wolf Management Plan (November,
2007). Subsequent to the certifications by the Governor, actions by
the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service and federal district court rulings
have vacated the publication upon which the initial certification
was based. The statute has been published in accordance with the Governor's
certifications.

§ 11-6-303.
Animal
damage management board (ADMB) created; composition; appointment;
terms; vacancies; compensation.

There is created the animal damage management board for the purposes of mitigating damage caused to livestock, wildlife and crops by predatory animals, predacious birds and depredating animals or for the protection of human health and safety. The board may mitigate damage caused by depredating animals by and through a memorandum of understanding with the Wyoming game and fish commission. The board shall be composed of twelve (12) members appointed by the governor as follows:

The director of the Wyoming department of agriculture;

The director of the Wyoming game and fish department;

One (1) domestic sheep producer;

One (1) cattle producer;

The state director for the United States department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service, wildlife services (USDA/APHIS/WS);

Two (2) members representing the interests of sportsmen, outfitters and hunters, not more than one (1) of these members shall be appointed to represent the interests of outfitters;

The president of the state predator management advisory board created under W.S.

11-6-201

;

One (1) member from an urban area;

One (1) member from the Wyoming game and fish commission;

One (1) member of the Wyoming board of agriculture; and

One (1) member representing the interests of nonconsumptive users of the state’s wildlife resource.

A representative from the United States forest service (USFS), the United States fish and wildlife service (USFWS) and United States bureau of land management (BLM) shall serve as exofficio nonvoting members of the board.

The directors of the departments of agriculture and game and fish shall serve as co-chairs of the ADMB and shall give general direction to the ADMB and the ADMB administrative officer.

The director of the department of agriculture or his designee shall serve as the ADMB’s administrative officer and carry out the ADMB’s administrative functions.

Except for the directors of the departments of agriculture and game and fish, the state director for the United States department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service, wildlife services (USDA/APHIS/WS), and the president of the state predator management advisory board created under W.S.

11-6-201

, the remaining members of the board shall hold office for staggered terms of four (4) years. For the remaining members of the initial board, four (4) members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years, four (4) members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years. Each appointed member shall be limited to serving on the board for eight (8) consecutive years, however, a member may be reappointed after a four (4) year absence. Each member shall hold office until his successor is appointed and has been qualified. As terms of current ADMB members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four (4) year term.

When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, a replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

Attendance of six (6) members at a duly called meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business. The ADMB shall convene at the times and places prescribed by the chair.

Members of the board who are not government employees shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the member’s official duties at the established state rate, to be paid from the animal damage management account.

Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.

State government officer and employee members who do not receive salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties from the ADMB at the established state rate, to be paid from the animal damage management account.

State government official and employee members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal” in (a)(vii) and (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-6-304.
Animal damage management board responsibilities; animal damage management policy; rules; methods to manage predatory animals, predacious birds, depredating animals and rabid wildlife; manner of calling meetings; frequency.

The ADMB is responsible for the formulation of the damage prevention management policy of the state, and by and through an executed memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the Wyoming game and fish commission is responsible for management of rabid wildlife, crop, livestock and wildlife damage done by depredating animals and wildlife damage by predatory animals and predacious birds. The ADMB in conjunction with its responsibility may, consistent with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act adopt rules to implement policies administered by the ADMB. After consultation with the livestock board and the department of health, the ADMB shall promulgate rules pertaining to rabies prevention in wildlife including surveillance, public education, vaccination protocol, post-exposure procedures and quarantines. The ADMB may enter into the agreements with law enforcing agencies to carry out the quarantine provisions. Nothing in this article shall preempt the Wyoming game and fish commission authority to manage wildlife or determine damage pursuant to any provision in title 23.

In its deliberations the ADMB shall:

Entertain requests for assistance in order to allow mitigation of predator damage;

Specify programs designed to prevent damage by predatory animals, rabid wildlife, predacious birds and depredating animals to livestock, agricultural crops, wildlife, property, human health and safety;

Provide various degrees of predatory animal, predacious bird and depredating animal damage management services to individual agricultural livestock and crop producers, landowners, lessors or administrators, and to urban, residential and industrial property owners. Damage management services shall also be provided and conducted for the benefit of wildlife populations and human health and safety;

Specify methods for the prevention and management of damage and for the selective control of predatory animals, rabid wildlife, predacious birds and depredating animals;

Maintain responsibility and appropriate funds for the purpose of providing damage prevention and management to agricultural livestock and crops, wildlife, property and human health and safety caused by predatory animals, rabid wildlife, predacious birds and depredating animals;

Cooperate with federal, state and county governments, educational institutions and private persons or organizations to effectuate agricultural and wildlife damage and rabid wildlife prevention policies;

Develop memorandums of understanding between the Wyoming department of agriculture and the Wyoming game and fish commission and the United States department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service, wildlife services (USDA/APHIS/WS) to accommodate funding sources and administrative guidelines for the program and may contract directly with federal or state agencies, boards of county commissioners, predator management districts or other organizations or associations to coordinate predator control services;

Consider any recommendations received from the Wyoming game and fish commission and the Wyoming department of agriculture.

The ADMB shall conduct meetings in accordance with its established policy, but shall meet at least once each year in the month of January.

The ADMB may adopt rules and regulations necessary for carrying out the purpose and provisions of this article. The ADMB may appoint employees and assistants as necessary and fix their compensation. The ADMB may enter into cooperative agreements with boards of county commissioners, predator management districts, federal or state agencies or other commissions, organizations or associations for the purpose of managing predatory animals, rabid wildlife, predacious birds and depredating animals. Predator management district boards which choose not to enter into a cooperative agreement with the ADMB shall not be precluded from continuing with, or entering into, a cooperative agreement or memorandum of understanding with the United States department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service, wildlife services (USDA/APHIS/WS), other entities of government, organizations or associations. This act [Wyoming Animal Damage Management Program] is not intended and shall not replace, rescind, modify nor cancel cooperative agreements or cooperative service agreements between the USDA/APHIS/WS and the county predator management districts created under W.S.

11-6-201

through

11-6-210

.

The ADMB may elect to provide various degrees of predator damage management services to any other person pursuant to a separately negotiated cooperative agreement.

The board shall investigate, test and refine the concept and practices of integrated predator management. The board shall develop and establish measurable goals and objectives. The board shall report to the governor and the joint agriculture, public lands and water resources interim committee and joint appropriations interim committee on or before November 30 of each year to determine the progress the board has made toward achieving the goals and objectives it has established. The report shall also include actions taken, the accomplishments and state monies expended by each county predator management board participating in state funding.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 43, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2011, ch. 19, § 1; 2022 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal control” and made a similar change in (d).

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2008 amendment,

added (f).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (f), inserted “and practices,” substituted “November 30” for “December 31,” and added the present last sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “and may contract directly with federal or state agencies, boards of county commissioners, predator management districts or other organizations or associations to coordinate predator control services” at the end of (b)(vii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See §
16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 11-6-305.
Wyoming animal damage management board
funding; sources; methods of collection.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 48, § 2.

The ADMB may receive money for predatory animal, predacious bird and depredating animal management from the federal government, state appropriations, counties, agencies, boards, associations, commissions, individuals and any other cooperators, and may expend monies to purchase supplies, materials, services, and to employ or contract personnel for predatory animal, predacious bird and depredating animal damage management. The ADMB may make supplies, materials, services and personnel available to cooperators at approximate cost.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2003, ch. 112, § 1; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207; 2020 ch. 48, § 2, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, in (a) substituted “fifty cents ($.50)” for “twenty-five cents ($.25).”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “Effective January 1, 2000” at the beginning.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, repealed (a) and (b), which read “(a) There is created a ‘wildlife damage management’ stamp. The stamp, issued at licensed selling agents as designated by the Wyoming game and fish commission may be purchased voluntarily. Proceeds from the sale of the stamp, excluding fifty cents ($.50) which the agent shall retain for each stamp sold, shall be deposited by the state treasurer into the animal damage management account created by W.S.

11-6-306

. The Wyoming game and fish commission shall retain the fees related to those administrative costs which are required to design and print stamps, and collect, account for and disburse these funds to the ADMB. The Wyoming game and fish commission shall annually provide to the ADMB a complete and detailed accounting of all administrative costs and fees. (b) The purchase price for the stamp shall be determined annually by the ADMB in whole dollar increments and established at such a level to meet financial obligations as budgeted.”

§ 11-6-306.
Animal
damage management account.

There is created the animal damage management account.

Money received under W.S.

11-6-305

shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the animal damage management account to be appropriated for the purposes provided in this article.

Any supplemental contributions received by the department from livestock owners for predatory animal, predacious bird or depredating animal damage management programs or the prevention and management of rabid wildlife shall be deposited into the animal damage management account.

The animal damage management account shall be administered for the ADMB by the Wyoming department of agriculture.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 43, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to payment to the landowner for antelope, deer, and elk killed on federal or state land, see §

23-3-105

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “in the special revenue fund” in (a).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2003, ch. 112, § 4, appropriates from the general fund a one-time appropriation of $125,000.00 to the animal damage management account. This one-time appropriation is not to be included in the department of agriculture's standard budget request for the 2005-2006 biennium.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 11-6-307.
Board to request funding from game and fish commission.

The board shall annually request two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) from the Wyoming game and fish commission. These funds shall be expended for wildlife priorities. The game and fish commission shall provide recommendations to the board regarding expenditure of these funds. Priority shall be given to projects that directly involve predator control that will have the greatest benefit to wildlife or will reduce the cost to the department for animal damage payments.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2020 ch. 48, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00)” for “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)” and “shall provide” for “may provide” and added the last sentence.

§ 11-6-308.
District
boards; relation to ADMB; duties generally.

Each predator management district board shall:

Exercise general supervision in determining local priorities for the management of predatory animals and predacious birds that prey upon and destroy livestock, other domestic animals, wildlife and crops;

Devise and put in operation those methods that best manage predatory animals and predacious birds;

Administer funds received to carry out the animal damage management program;

Maintain existing financial and physical resources;

Provide input to the ADMB.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-6-309.
Predator
management district participation with the ADMB.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, if the predator management district has elected to participate in providing funding or upon approval of the ADMB, other in-kind resources, to the animal damage management account, the district may solicit funds or receive services from the ADMB under separate negotiated agreement. Two (2) or more districts may jointly solicit funds or receive services from the ADMB for purposes of this section.

Whether or not a predator management district has elected to participate in providing funding to the animal damage management account, the district may solicit funds or receive services from the ADMB for control of gray wolves designated as predatory animals.

In any area of the state not under the jurisdiction of a county predatory animal board, eligible applicants for funds appropriated to the animal damage management board for the purpose of controlling wolves designated as predatory animals include state or county agencies.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1; 2012, ch. 25, § 1; 2020 ch. 48, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal.”

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2012 amendment,

redesignated the existing provisions as (a); added “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” in (a); and added (b) and (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in (a) added the last sentence.

§ 11-6-310.
Applicability of chapter.

This article, unless
contrary to federal law, shall apply to all federal, state and private
lands.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1.

§ 11-6-311.
Exemptions.

The state predator management
advisory board or the ADMB may exempt persons from payment of the
imposed fees when the respective board determines that livestock as
defined in this act [Wyoming Animal Damage Management Program] are
permanently confined within pens or corrals within incorporated city
limits where animal damage control activity by state or federal agencies
is prohibited or severely restricted.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal.”

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 11-6-312.
Cooperative agreements generally.

The ADMB may enter into
cooperative agreements with other governmental agencies, counties,
associations, corporations or individuals for carrying out the purposes
of this article.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1.

§ 11-6-313.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008,
ch. 39, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 197, § 1 and Laws 2003, ch. 112, § 1, related to the expiration date of this article.

Laws 2008, ch. 39, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.